Massachusetts, session 194th, S702.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8G of chapter 26 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
Upon a declaration of an emergency in any area of the commonwealth by the governor or
upon the declaration by the commissioner of insurance that severe weather conditions or other
circumstances have resulted in a claims emergency, and notwithstanding any other provision of
this section, an insurer may appoint temporary qualified appraisers to facilitate the prompt
resolution of claims arising out of the emergency by notifying the Board either in writing,
electronically or by facsimile. An appraiser already licensed in another state or an appraiser who
works for an insurer that does business in Massachusetts and who regularly appraises motor
of 2

vehicles in a state where an appraiser license is not required shall be considered a qualified
appraiser. A qualified appraiser so appointed shall be considered licensed for all purposes of this
section, that that status shall terminate upon a determination by the commissioner of insurance
that temporary appraisers are no longer required to facilitate the resolution of claims.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on enactment.
of 2